Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.085

Fee for conviction or plea of guilty.

Upon conviction or a plea of guilty in any court organized under this title or Title 35 RCW, a defendant in a criminal case is liable for a fee of $43, except this fee shall not be imposed on a defendant who is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). This fee shall be subject to division with the state under RCW * 3.46.120(2), 3.50.100(2), 3.62.020(2), 3.62.040(2), and 35.20.220(2).

[ 2022 c 260 s 16; 2018 c 269 s 16; 2005 c 457 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 3.46.120 was repealed by 2008 c 227 s 12.

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.